Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1384.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 7-140 of Title 26, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. There is hereby created within the State Election Board the


In-Person Absentee Voting Expansion Grant Program for the purpose of


providing financial assistance to county election boards to


establish and operate additional in-person absentee voting sites for


statewide elections held in November of even-numbered years.


B. Counties that meet the following criteria may apply in even-


numbered years for funding under the In-Person Absentee Voting

Req. No. 3079 Page 1


Expansion Grant Program for each additional in-person absentee


voting location:


1. Counties with more than four hundred thousand (400,000)


registered voters may receive up to six grants for up to six


additional in-person absentee voting locations;


2. Counties with more than one hundred thousand (100,000)


registered voters may receive up to five grants for up to five


additional in-person absentee voting locations;


3. Counties with more than fifty thousand (50,000) registered


voters may receive up to four grants for up to four additional in-


person absentee voting locations; and


4. Counties with more than twenty-five thousand (25,000)


registered voters or encompassing more than one thousand five


hundred (1,500) square miles in land area may receive up to two


grants for up to two additional in-person absentee voting locations.


C. County election boards that operate two or more in-person


absentee voting locations with county election board funds may apply


in even-numbered years for grants to cover expenses related to the


establishment and operation of the in-person absentee voting


locations.


D. Beginning July 1, 2027, the State Election Board shall award


grants in the amount of Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00)


for each approved grant application to cover expenses related to


establishing and operating one in-person absentee voting location

Req. No. 3079 Page 2


including, but not limited to, staffing, facility rental, equipment,


security, and administrative costs. Such grants shall only be used


for expenses related to the establishment and operation of an in-


person absentee voting location authorized by subsection B of this


section.


E. County election boards applying for grants shall submit a


grant application to the State Election Board in the manner


prescribed by rule. Applications shall include a proposed location


and justification based on population distribution, travel distance,


access needs, and expected voter turnout, a staffing and security


plan, and any additional information required by the State Election


Board. The State Election Board shall review and approve


applications based on compliance with this section and availability


of program funding or an allocation to the revolving fund described


in Section 2 of this act.


F. The Secretary of the State Election Board shall promulgate


rules, forms, and procedures necessary to implement the In-Person


Absentee Voting Expansion Grant Program including, but not limited


to, criteria for distributing funds, timelines for applications,


reporting requirements, and allowable expenditures.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 7-140.1 of Title 26, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:



Req. No. 3079 Page 3


There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund


for the State Election Board to be designated the “In-Person


Absentee Voting Expansion Grant Program Revolving Fund”. The fund


shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations,


and shall consist of all monies received by the State Election Board


from the Legislature provided for the purpose of administering the


In-Person Absentee Voting Expansion Grant Program. All monies


accruing to the credit of the fund are hereby appropriated and may


be budgeted and expended by the State Election Board for the purpose


provided for in Section 1 of this act. Expenditures from the fund


shall be made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer against


claims filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of


Management and Enterprise Services for approval and payment.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective January 1, 2027.




60-2-3079 BLB 12/30/2025 9:56:03 PM

















Req. No. 3079 Page 4